South Dakota, session 2026, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-13-35 be AMENDED:
10-13-35. This section does not apply to school districts. The total amount of
revenue payable from taxes on real property within a taxing district, excluding the levy
pursuant to § 10-13-36, may increase no more than the lesser of three percent or the
index factor, as defined in § 10-13-38, over the amount of revenue payable from taxes
on real property in the preceding year, excluding the amount of taxes levied pursuant to
§ 10-13-36.
After applying the index factor, a taxing district may increase the revenue payable
from taxes on real property above the limitations provided by this section by the
percentage increase of value resulting from any improvements or change in use of real
property, annexation, minor boundary changes, and any adjustments in taxation of
property separately classified and subject to statutory adjustments and reductions under
chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A, and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if assessed the same as
property of equal value. For taxes payable in 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031, an
increase in revenue payable to a taxing district, except an improvement district under
chapter 7-25A, allowed under this paragraph may not exceed three percent.
A taxing district may increase the revenue it receives from taxes on real property
above the limit provided by this section for taxes levied to pay the principal, interest, and
redemption charges on any bonds which are subject to referendum, scheduled payment
increases on bonds, for a levy directed by the order of a court for the purpose of paying a
judgment against the taxing district, upon the termination of a tax increment financing
district pursuant to § 11-9-46, or upon the application of any discretionary formula to real
property pursuant to § 10-6-137. Any taxing district created after the effective date of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.911.12 2 230
this section is exempt from the limitation provided by this section for a period of two years
immediately following its creation.
For purposes of this section, an increase in value resulting from an improvement
made to an owner-occupied single-family dwelling does not include additions to, or
improvements of, existing structures affixed to land that result in an increase in value of
forty percent or less to the owner-occupied single-family dwelling.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.